Utah statutes.
63M-7-517.   Additional testing.
(1)  If the mental, physical, or emotional condition of a victim is material
to a claim, the reparations officer, director, or chair of the board who hears
the claim or the appeal may order the claimant to submit to a mental or
physical examination by a physician or psychologist and may recommend to the
court to order an autopsy of a deceased victim.
(2)  Any order for additional examination shall be for good cause shown and
shall provide notice to the person to be examined and the person's
representative.
(3)  All reports from additional examinations shall set out findings,
including results of all tests made, diagnoses, prognoses, other conclusions,
and reports of earlier examinations of the same conditions.
(4)  A copy of the report shall be made available to the victim or the
representative of the victim unless dissemination of that copy is prohibited
by law.
